Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-909
Outpatient treatment, defined.

Outpatient treatment means treatment ordered by a mental health board directing a subject to comply with specified outpatient treatment requirements, including, but not limited to, (1) taking prescribed medication, (2) reporting to a mental health professional or treatment facility for treatment or for monitoring of the subject's condition, or (3) participating in individual or group therapy or educational, rehabilitation, residential, or vocational programs.

Laws 1994, LB 498, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1007.01;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 29.